hu: Babaház méretaránya: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Egyéb
lt-LT: Lėlių namelio mastelis: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Kita
ja: ドールハウススケール: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; その他
sk-SK: Mierka domčeka pre bábiky: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Iná
ro-RO: Scală pentru casa de păpuși: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Altele
fi: Nukkekodin mittasuhde: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Muu
sl-SI: Merilo hišice za punčke: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Drugo
it: Scala per casa delle bambole: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Altro
nb: Dukkehusskala: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Annet
es: Escala de la casa de muñecas: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Otro
zh-CN: 玩具屋比例规格: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; 其他
tr: Oyuncak ev ölçüsü: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Diğer
en: Dollhouse scale: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Other
pt-BR: Escala da casa de bonecas: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Outro
bg-BG: Мащаб на къщата за кукли: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Друго
fr: Échelle de la maison de poupée: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Autre
hr-HR: Mjerilo za kućicu za lutke: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Ostalo
da: Dukkehusskala: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Anden
vi: Tỷ lệ nhà búp bê: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Khác
nl: Poppenhuis schaal: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Overig
th: สเกลบ้านตุ๊กตา: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; อื่นๆ
de: Maßstab des Puppenhauses: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Sonstige
ko: 인형의 집 스케일: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; 기타
sv: Dockhus skala: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Övrigt
ru: Масштаб кукольного домика: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Другое
el: Κλίμακα κουκλόσπιτου: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Άλλο
cs: Měřítko domečku pro panenky: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Ostatní
pl: Skala domku dla lalek: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Inna
zh-TW: 娃娃屋比例: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; 其他
pt-PT: Expansão da casa de bonecas: 1:10; 1:12; 1:144; 1:16; 1:18; 1:24; 1:32; 1:48; 1:6; 1:64; 1:8; Outro